Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.95.900

Construction of chapter—Limitations.

This chapter shall not be construed as a promise that any beneficiary shall be granted admission to any institution of higher education, will earn any specific or minimum number of academic credits, or will graduate from any such institution. In addition, this chapter shall not be construed as a promise of either course or program availability.

Participation in the advanced college tuition payment program or the Washington college savings program does not guarantee an eligible beneficiary the right to resident tuition and fees. To qualify for resident and respective tuition subsidies, the eligible beneficiary must meet the applicable provisions of RCW 28B.15.011 through 28B.15.015.

This chapter shall not be construed to imply that the redemption of tuition units in the advanced college tuition payment program shall be equal to any value greater than the undergraduate tuition and services and activities fees at a state institution of higher education as computed under this chapter. Eligible beneficiaries will be responsible for payment of any other fee that does not qualify as a services and activities fee including, but not limited to, any expenses for tuition surcharges, tuition overload fees, laboratory fees, equipment fees, book fees, rental fees, room and board charges, or fines.

[ 2016 c 69 s 18; 1997 c 289 s 11.]